North Carolina statutes. Chapter 37A. Uniform Principal and Income Act.
Part 2. Conversion to Unitrust.

§ 37A-1-104.1.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply to this Part:

Code. — The Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and any statutory enactment successor to the Code; reference to a specific section of the Code in this Part shall be considered a reference also to any successor provision dealing with the subject matter of that section of the Code.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-106, s. 45, effective October 1, 2007.

Disinterested person. — A person who is not a related or subordinate party with respect to the person then acting as trustee of the trust and excludes the settlor of the trust and any interested trustee.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-106, s. 45, effective October 1, 2007.

Income trust. — A trust, created by either an inter vivos or a testamentary instrument, which directs or permits the trustee to distribute the net income of the trust to one or more persons, either in fixed proportions or in amounts or proportions determined by the trustee, and regardless of whether the trust directs or permits the trustee to distribute principal of the trust to one or more of those persons.

Interested distributee. — A living beneficiary who is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal who has the power to remove the existing trustee and designate as successor a person who may be a related or subordinate party with respect to that distributee.

Interested trustee. — Any of the following:

An individual trustee who is a qualified beneficiary.

Any trustee who may be removed and replaced by an interested distributee.

An individual trustee whose legal obligation to support a beneficiary may be satisfied by distributions of income and principal of the trust.

(7a)

Legal disability. — A person under a legal disability is a person who is a minor, an incompetent, or an unborn individual, or whose identity or location is unknown.

(7b)

Qualified beneficiary. — A qualified beneficiary as defined in

G.S. 36C-1-103(15)

.

Related or subordinate party. — A related or subordinate party as defined in section 672(c) of the Code.

(8a)

Representative. — A person who may represent and bind another as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 36C of the General Statutes, the provisions of which shall apply for purposes of this Article.

(8b)

Settlor. — An individual, including a testator, who creates a trust.

Total return unitrust. — An income trust that has been converted under and meets the provisions of this Part.

(9a)

Treasury regulations. — The regulations, rulings, procedures, notices, or other administrative pronouncements issued by the Internal Revenue Service, as amended from time to time.

Trustee. — Any person acting as trustee of the trust, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Part, whether acting in that person’s discretion or on the direction of one or more persons acting in a fiduciary capacity.

Unitrust amount. — An amount computed as a percentage of the fair market value of the trust.

History.

2003-232, s. 2; 2005-244, ss. 1, 2; 2007-106, s. 45.

§ 37A-1-104.2.
Conversion in trustee’s discretion without court approval.

Any trustee, other than an interested trustee, or, where two or more persons are acting as trustees, a majority of the trustees who are not interested trustees (in either case hereafter “trustee”), may, in the trustee’s sole discretion and without court approval, (i) convert an income trust to a total return unitrust, (ii) reconvert a total return unitrust to an income trust, or (iii) change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust if all of the following apply:

The trustee adopts a written policy for the trust providing (i) in the case of a trust being administered as an income trust, that future distributions from the trust will be unitrust amounts rather than net income, (ii) in the case of a trust being administered as a total return unitrust, that future distributions from the trust will be net income rather than unitrust amounts, or (iii) that the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust will be changed as stated in the policy.

The trustee gives written notice of its intention to take the action, including copies of the written policy and this Part, to (i) the settlor of the trust, if living, and (ii) all persons who are the qualified beneficiaries of the trust at the time the notice is given. If a qualified beneficiary is under a legal disability, notice shall be given to the representative of the qualified beneficiary if a representative is available without court order.

There is at least (i) one qualified beneficiary described in

G.S. 36C-1-103(15)

a. or b. who is not under a legal disability or a representative of a qualified beneficiary so described and (ii) one qualified beneficiary described in

G.S. 36C-1-103(15)

c. who is not under a legal disability or a representative of a qualified beneficiary so described.

and

No person receiving notice of the trustee’s intention to take the proposed action objects to the action within 60 days after notice has been given. The objection shall be by written instrument delivered to the trustee.

If there is no trustee of the trust other than an interested trustee, the interested trustee or, where two or more persons are acting as trustee and are interested trustees, a majority of the interested trustees may, in its sole discretion and without court approval, (i) convert an income trust to a total return unitrust, (ii) reconvert a total return unitrust to an income trust, or (iii) change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust if all of the following apply:

The trustee adopts a written policy for the trust providing (i) in the case of a trust being administered as an income trust, that future distributions from the trust will be unitrust amounts rather than net income as determined under this Chapter, (ii) in the case of a trust being administered as a total return unitrust, that future distributions from the trust will be net income as determined under this Chapter rather than unitrust amounts, or (iii) that the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust will be changed as stated in the policy.

The trustee appoints a disinterested person who, in its sole discretion but acting in a fiduciary capacity, determines for the trustee (i) the percentage to be used to calculate the unitrust amount, (ii) the method to be used in determining the fair market value of the trust, and (iii) which assets, if any, are to be excluded in determining the unitrust amount.

The trustee gives written notice of its intention to take the action, including copies of the written policy and this Part, and the determinations of the disinterested person to (i) the settlor of the trust, if living, and (ii) all persons who are the qualified beneficiaries of the trust at the time of the giving of the notice. If a qualified beneficiary is under a legal disability, notice shall be given to the representative of the qualified beneficiary if a representative is available without court order.

There is at least one (i) qualified beneficiary described in

G.S. 36C-1-103(15)

a. or b. or a representative of a beneficiary so described and (ii) one qualified beneficiary described in

G.S. 36C-1-103(15)

c. or a representative of a qualified beneficiary so described.

No person receiving notice of the trustee’s intention to take the proposed action of the trustee objects to the action or to the determination of the disinterested person within 60 days after notice has been given. The objection must be by written instrument delivered to the trustee.

A trustee may act under subsection (a) or (b) of this section with respect to a trust for which both income and principal have been set aside permanently for charitable purposes under the governing instrument and for which a federal estate or gift tax deduction has been taken, provided that all of the following apply:

Instead of sending written notice to the persons described in subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of this section or subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsection (b) of this section, as the case may be, the trustee shall send written notice to each charitable organization expressly designated to receive the income of the trust under the governing instrument and, if no charitable organization is expressly designated to receive all of the income of the trust under the governing instrument, to the Attorney General of this State.

Subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section or subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of this section, as the case may be, shall not apply to this action.

In each taxable year, the trustee shall distribute the greater of the unitrust amount or the amount required by section 4942 of the Code.

The provisions of

G.S. 36C-1-109

regarding notices and the sending of documents to persons under Chapter 36C of the General Statutes shall apply for purposes of notices and the sending of documents under this section.

History.

2003-232, s. 2; 2005-244, s. 3; 2007-106, s. 46.

§ 37A-1-104.3.
Conversion with court approval.

If any trustee desires to (i) convert an income trust to a total return unitrust, (ii) reconvert a total return unitrust to an income trust, or (iii) change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust but does not have the ability to or elects not to do it under

G.S. 37A-1-104

.2, the trustee may petition the court for an order as the trustee considers appropriate. In the event, however, there is only one trustee of the trust and the trustee is an interested trustee or in the event there are two or more trustees of the trust and a majority of them are interested trustees, the court, in its own discretion or on the petition of the trustee or trustees or any person interested in the trust, may appoint a disinterested person who, acting in a fiduciary capacity, shall present information to the court as shall be necessary to enable the court to make its determinations under this Part.

A qualified beneficiary or a representative of a qualified beneficiary may request the trustee to (i) convert an income trust to a total return unitrust, (ii) reconvert a total return unitrust to an income trust, or (iii) change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount or the method used to determine the fair market value of the trust. If the trustee does not take the action requested, the qualified beneficiary or a representative of the qualified beneficiary may petition the court to order the trustee to take the action.

All proceedings under this section shall be conducted as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 36C of the General Statutes.

History.

2003-232, s. 2; 2007-106, s. 47.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-106, s. 47, effective October 1, 2007, substituted “G.S. 37A-1-104.2,” for “G.S. 36A-1-104.2,” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted “qualified” for “competent” twice and inserted “or a representative of a qualified beneficiary” twice; and substituted “Article 2 of Chapter 36C of the General Statutes” for “Article 3 of Chapter 36A of the General Statutes” at the end of subsection (c).
See Editor’s note for applicability.

§ 37A-1-104.4.
Determination of unitrust amount.

The fair market value of the trust shall be determined at least annually, using a valuation date selected by the trustee in its discretion. The trustee, in its discretion, may use an average of the fair market value on the same valuation date for the current fiscal year and not more than three preceding fiscal years, if the use of this average appears desirable to reduce the impact of fluctuations in market value on the unitrust amount. Assets for which a fair market value cannot be readily ascertained shall be valued using valuation methods as are considered reasonable and appropriate by the trustee. Assets, such as a residence or tangible personal property, used by the trust beneficiary may be excluded from the fair market value for computing the unitrust amount.

The percentage to be used in determining the unitrust amount shall be a reasonable current return from the trust, in any event not less than three percent (3%) nor more than five percent (5%), taking into account the intentions of the settlor of the trust as expressed in the governing instrument, the needs of the beneficiaries, general economic conditions, projected current earnings and appreciation for the trust, and projected inflation and its impact on the trust.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-244, s. 4, effective July 30, 2005. See notes for applicability language.

Following the conversion of an income trust to a total return unitrust, the trustee:

Shall consider the unitrust amount as paid from net accounting income determined as if the trust were not a unitrust;

Shall then consider the unitrust amount as paid from ordinary income not allocable to net accounting income;

May, in the trustee’s discretion, consider the unitrust amount as paid from net short-term gain described in section 1222(5) of the Code and then from net long-term capital gain described in section 1222(7) of the Code so long as the discretionary power is exercised consistently and in a reasonable and impartial manner, but the amount so paid from net capital gains may not be greater than the excess of the unitrust amount over the amount of distributable net income as defined in section 643(a) of the Code without regard to section 1.643(a)-3(b) of the Treasury Regulations, as amended from time to time; and

Shall then consider the unitrust amount as coming from the principal of the trust.

History.

2003-232, s. 2; 2005-244, s. 4; 2007-106, ss. 48, 49.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-106, ss. 48 and 49, effective October 1, 2007, inserted “also” following “trust beneficiary” in the last sentence of subsection (a), and substituted “settlor” for “grantor” near the middle of subsection (b).
See Editor’s note for applicability.

§ 37A-1-104.5.
Matters in trustee’s discretion.

In administering a total return unitrust, the trustee may, in its sole discretion but subject to the provisions of the governing instrument, determine:

The effective date of the conversion;

The timing of distributions, including provisions for prorating a distribution for a short year in which a beneficiary’s right to payments commences or ceases;

Whether distributions are to be made in cash or in kind or partly in cash and partly in kind;

If the trust is reconverted to an income trust, the effective date of the reconversion; and

Any other administrative issues as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this Part.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-1-104.6.
No effect on principal distributions.

Conversion to a total return unitrust under this Part shall not affect any other provision of the governing instrument, if any, regarding distributions of principal. For purposes of this Part, the distribution of a unitrust amount is considered a distribution of income and not of principal.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-1-104.7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-106, s. 49.1, effective October 1, 2007.

§ 37A-1-104.8.
No liability on part of trustee or disinterested person acting in good faith.

No trustee or disinterested person who in good faith takes or fails to take any action under this Part shall be liable to any person affected by the action or inaction, regardless of whether the person received written notice as provided in this Part and regardless of whether the person was under a legal disability at the time of the delivery of the notice. The exclusive remedy for any person affected by an action or inaction shall be to obtain an order of the court directing the trustee (i) to convert an income trust to a total return unitrust, (ii) to reconvert from a total return unitrust to an income trust, or (iii) to change the percentage used to calculate the unitrust amount.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-1-104.9.
Applicability.

This Part shall apply to all trusts in existence on, or created after January 1, 2004, unless (i) the governing instrument contains a provision clearly expressing the settlor’s intention that the current beneficiary or beneficiaries are to receive an amount other than a reasonable current return from the trust, (ii) the trust is a trust described in section 170(f)(2)(B), section 664(d), section 2702(a)(3), or section 2702(b) of the Code, (iii) the trust is a trust under which any amount is, or has been in the past, set aside permanently for charitable purposes unless the income from the trust also is devoted permanently to charitable purposes, or (iv) the governing instrument expressly prohibits use of this Part by specific reference to this Part, or expressly states the settlor’s intent that net income not be calculated as a unitrust amount. A provision in the governing instrument that “the provisions of Part 2 of Article 1 of Chapter 37A of the General Statutes or any corresponding provision of future law, shall not be used in the administration of this trust.” or “the trustee shall not determine the distributions to the income beneficiary as a unitrust amount.” or similar words reflecting that intent is sufficient to preclude the use of this Part.

History.

2003-232, s. 2; 2005-244, s. 5; 2007-106, s. 50.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-106, s. 50, effective October 1, 2007, substituted “settlor’s” for “grantor’s” twice.
See Editor’s note for applicability.